District of Columbia statutes.
42-2706.03

Allocation of bond issuing authority.

All of the authority of the District government to issue qualified mortgage bonds in each calendar year under the Mortgage Subsidy Bond Tax Act of 1980 (26 U.S.C. § 1100 et seq.) as it may be amended from time to time with respect to the District is allocated to the Agency.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-135, § 603
as added Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-28, § 2(w), 28 DCR 2848

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2163.
1973 Ed., § 45-1932.

References in Text

The Mortgage Subsidy Bond Tax Act of 1980 is codified as notes under 26 U.S.C. §§ 1, 103A, and 141, not as 26 U.S.C. § 1100 et seq.